Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.69.010

Powers and duties prescribed.

Every code city shall have the powers, perform the functions and duties and enforce the regulations prescribed by general laws relating to food and drugs for any class of city as provided by Title 69 RCW; relating to water pollution control as provided by chapter 90.48 RCW; and relating to food fish and shellfish as provided by Title 77 RCW.

[ 2003 c 39 s 18; 1999 c 291 s 31; 1994 c 143 s 512. Prior: 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 177; 1983 c 3 s 71; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.69.010.]